Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $60,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $60,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for grants to the Northern Crops Institute. Grants authorized under this section may be used to purchase equipment. new text end